Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-2] Assistants. The director may
appoint and remove assistants to assist the director in carrying out the
director's activities, duties, and other obligations under this chapter. [L
2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next